Utah statutes.
22-6-2.   Income permitted to accumulate.

The income arising from or earned by the property held in such trust within the classifications mentioned, may be permitted to accumulate in accordance with the terms of such trust, for so long a time as may be permitted by the instrument creating the trust, or if no time is so specified, for such time as the trustee or trustees may deem necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the trust was created.

